Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.300

Restraining orders—Notice—Refusal to comply—Arrest—Penalty—Defense—Peace officers, immunity.

(1) Whenever a restraining order is issued under this chapter, and the person to be restrained knows of the order, a violation of the provisions restricting the person from acts or threats of violence or of a provision restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace, school, or day care of another, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, a protected party's person, or a protected party's vehicle, is punishable under RCW 7.105.450.

(2) A person is deemed to have notice of a restraining order if:

(a) The person to be restrained or the person's attorney signed the order;

(b) The order recites that the person to be restrained or the person's attorney appeared in person before the court;

(c) The order was served upon the person to be restrained; or

(d) The peace officer gives the person oral or written evidence of the order by reading from it or handing to the person a certified copy of the original order, certified to be an accurate copy of the original by a notary public or by the clerk of the court.

(3) A peace officer shall verify the existence of a restraining order by:

(a) Obtaining information confirming the existence and terms of the order from a law enforcement agency; or

(b) Obtaining a certified copy of the order, certified to be an accurate copy of the original by a notary public or by the clerk of the court.

(4) A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a) A restraining order has been issued under this chapter;

(b) The respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order; and

(c) The person to be arrested has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace, school, or day care of another, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location.

(5) It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this section that the court order was issued contrary to law or court rule.

(6) No peace officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest under subsection (4) of this section if the officer acts in good faith and without malice.

[ 2021 c 215 s 135; 2000 c 119 s 21; 1996 c 248 s 9; 1995 c 246 s 27; 1984 c 263 s 28; 1974 ex.s. c 99 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Application—2000 c 119: See note following RCW 10.31.100.